Utah statutes.
17-16a-8.   Investment creating conflict of interest with duties --
Disclosure.
Any personal interest of or investment by any elected or appointed official of
a county which creates a potential or actual conflict between the official's
personal interests and his public duties shall be disclosed in open meeting to
the members of the body in the manner required by Section 17-16a-6.
